Hawaii, session 2026, SB2817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that speed remains one of the leading factors contributing to traffic accidents, serious injuries, and fatalities on Hawaii's roadways.  Due to the state's unique topography, weather, and limited space, Hawaii's roads are generally not designed for higher speeds. These factors also contribute to the severity of accidents involving speeding. The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration reports that, at higher speeds, passenger vehicle compartments have diminishing occupant protection given the forces released in high-speed crashes.  The trend of increasing vehicle size, while providing greater occupant protection, means that higher energies are absorbed by others involved in crashes with larger vehicles.  In addition, the power-to-weight ratio of vehicles has increased over time, and it has been shown that people driving more powerful vehicles are more likely to exceed the speed limit. The legislature also recognizes that driver support features such as adaptive cruise control may not always work as intended, potentially contributing to increases in speeding.  Cultural norms also continue to glorify speeding.  Motor vehicles are marketed using speed and have capabilities that far exceed any legal limits of even high-speed highways. The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration notes that lowering speed limits and increasing penalties for speeding are demonstrated to be effective countermeasures to speeding. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the statutory standard for excessive speeding. SECTION 2.  Section 291C-105, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle at a speed exceeding: (1)  The applicable state or county speed limit by [thirty] twenty miles per hour or more; or (2)  [Eighty] Seventy miles per hour or more irrespective of the applicable state or county speed limit." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________